Mississippi, session 2026, SB2898.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Upon the effective date of this act, the State Treasurer, in conjunction with the State Fiscal Officer, shall transfer the sum of Twenty Million Dollars ($20,000,000.00) from the Capital Expense Fund (Fund No. 6499C00000) to the Disaster Assistance Trust Fund (Fund No. 3372500000). SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.